Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-780
Basic coverage for treatment of alcoholism; when considered available.

An insurance company or health maintenance organization will be considered to be providing basic coverage for treatment of alcoholism if it makes benefits available for the treatment described in section 44-778 on terms involving durational limits, dollar limits, deductibles, and coinsurance which are no less favorable than the terms on which it makes benefits available for the treatment of physical illness generally.

Laws 1980, LB 646, § 12;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 160.